Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.395, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Workforce plan data. (a) Grantees that serve more than deleted text begin 10,000deleted text end new text begin 100,000new text end broadband customers and are receiving funding for projects under this section are required to provide in annual reports information on the workforce performing installation work funded through the grant, including: (1) the number of installation labor hours performed by workforce directly employed by the grantee or the Internet service provider; (2) the number of installation labor hours performed by contractors and subcontractors on grant-funded projects with subtotals for hours worked by Minnesota residents, people of color, Indigenous people, women, and people with disabilities; (3) the name, business address, and number of labor hours performed by each contractor and subcontractor that participated in construction of a grant-funded project; (4) the percentages of workforce performing installation labor whose straight-time hourly pay rate was at least $25 and who received employer-paid medical coverage and retirement benefits; and (5) any other workforce plan information as determined by the commissioner. (b) Following an award, the workforce plan and the requirement to submit ongoing workforce reports shall be incorporated as material conditions of the contract with the department and become enforceable, certified commitments. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.17, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. deleted text begin Telecommunications and cable communications systemsdeleted text end new text begin Utility infrastructurenew text end . (a) The commission has authority under this section to investigate, upon complaint or on its own motion, conduct by or on behalf of a deleted text begin telecommunications carrier, telephone company, or cable communications system providerdeleted text end new text begin public utility, private utility, or cooperative electric associationnew text end that impacts publicnew text begin or privatenew text end utility or cooperative electric association infrastructure. If the commission finds that the conduct damaged or unreasonably interfered with the function of the infrastructure, the commission may take any action authorized under sections 216B.52 to 216B.61 with respect to the provider. (b) For purposes of this subdivision: (1) "telecommunications carrier" has the meaning given in section 237.01, subdivision 6; (2) "telephone company" has the meaning given in section 237.01, subdivision 7; and (3) "cable communications system provider" means an owner or operator of a cable communications system, as defined in section 238.02, subdivision 3. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section: (1) "directional drilling" means a drilling method that utilizes a steerable drill bit to cut a bore hole for installing underground utilities; (2) "safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer" means a personnew text begin hired after July 1, 2027,new text end who has completed underground utilities installation certification under subdivision 3; (3) "underground telecommunications utilities" means buried broadband, telephone and other telecommunications transmission, distribution and service lines, and associated facilities; and (4) "underground utilities" means buried electric transmission and distribution lines, gas and hazardous liquids pipelines and distribution lines, sewer and water pipelines, telephone or telecommunications lines, and associated facilities. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Installation requirements. (a) The installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers as follows: (1) the location of existing utilities by hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer;new text begin andnew text end (2) where telecommunications infrastructure is installed by means of directional drilling, the monitoring of the location and depth of the drill head must be performed by a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) no fewer than two safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers must be present at all times at any location where telecommunications infrastructure is being installed by means of directional drilling. deleted text end (b) Beginning July 1, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end , all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within the seven-county metropolitan area must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. (c) Beginning January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end , all installations of underground telecommunications infrastructure subject to this subdivision within this state must be performed by safety-qualified underground telecommunications installers that meet the requirements of this subdivision. new text begin (d) The installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is less than 36 inches in depth on private property is exempt from this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.198, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Certification Standards. (a) The commissioner of labor and industry, in consultation with the Office of Broadband, shall approve standards for a safety-qualified underground telecommunications installer certification program that requires a person to: (1) complete a deleted text begin 40-hourdeleted text end new text begin four-hournew text end initial course that includes classroomnew text begin , virtual classroom, or learning management systemnew text end and hands-on instruction covering proper work procedures for safe installation of underground utilities, including: (i) regulations applicable to excavation near existing utilities; (ii) identification, location, and verification of utility lines using hand- or hydro-excavation or other accepted methods; (iii) response to line strike incidents; (iv) traffic control procedures; (v) use of a tracking device to safely guide directional drill equipment along a drill path; and (vi) avoidance and mitigation of safety hazards posed by underground utility installation projects;new text begin andnew text end (2) demonstrate knowledge of the course material by successfully completing an examination approved by the commissionerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) complete a four-hour refresher course within three years of completing the original course and every three years thereafter in order to maintain certification. deleted text end (b) The commissioner must develop an approval process for training providers under this subdivision and may suspend or revoke the approval of any training provider that fails to demonstrate consistent delivery of approved curriculum or success in preparing participants to complete the examination. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end